test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_cuarvud_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

  Verb - čuárvuđ: # MLO checked
    čuárvuđ+V+Inf: čuárvuđ
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuárvum
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: čuárvuh
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuárvu
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čuárvoon
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: čuárvuvettee
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: čuárvuv
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: čuárvup
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: čuárvuvetteđ
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čuárvuh
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čuorvum
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: čuorvuh
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čuárvui
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: čuárvoim
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: čuárvoid
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: čuárvoin
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: čuárvuim
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: čuárvuid
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čuorvuu
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Sg1: čuárvuččim 
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Sg2: čuárvuččih
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Sg3: čuárvuččij
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Du1: čuárvuččáim
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Du2: čuárvuččáid
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Du3: čuárvuččáin
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Pl1: čuárvuččijm
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Pl2: čuárvuččijd
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Pl3: čuárvuččii
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Sg1: čuárvoom
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Sg2: čuárvooh
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Sg3: čuárvuš
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Du1: čuárvužeen
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Du2: čuárvušvettee
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Du3: čuárvužává
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Pl1: čuárvužep
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Pl2: čuárvušvetteđ
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Pl3: čuárvužeh
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: -
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: čuárvu
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: čuárvus
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: čuárvoon
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: čuárvoo
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: čuárvus
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: čuárvup
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: čuárvuđ
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: čuárvus
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čuárvu
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: čuárvum
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: čuárvuččii
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: čuorvuu
    čuárvuđ+V+PrsPrc: čuárvoo
    čuárvuđ+V+PrfPrc: čuárvum
    čuárvuđ+V+Actio: čuárvum
    čuárvuđ+V+Actio+Ess: čuárvumin
    čuárvuđ+V+Actio+Loc: čuárvumist
    čuárvuđ+V+Actio+Ill: čuárvumân
    čuárvuđ+V+Actio+Com: čuárvudijn
    čuárvuđ+V+VAbess: čuárvuhánnáá
    #čuárvuđ+V+VAbess: čuárvuhinnáá
    #čuárvuđ+V+VAbess: čuárvuhennáá


  Verb - uážžuđ: # MLO checked
    uážžuđ+V+Inf: uážžuđ
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uážum
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: uážuh
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uážžu
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: uážžoon
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: uážžuvettee
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: uážžuv
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: uážžup
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: uážžuvetteđ
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: uážžuh
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ožžum
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ožžuh
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: uážui
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: uážžoim
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: uážžoid
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: uážžoin
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: uážuim
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: uážuid
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ožžuu
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Sg1: uážuččim
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Sg2: uážuččih
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Sg3: uážuččij
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Du1: uážuččáim
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Du2: uážuččáid
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Du3: uážuččáin
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Pl1: uážuččijm
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Pl2: uážuččijd
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Pl3: uážuččii
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Sg1: uážžoom
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Sg2: uážžooh
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Sg3: uážuš
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Du1: uážužeen
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Du2: uážušvettee
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Du3: uážužává
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Pl1: uážužep
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Pl2: uážušvetteđ
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Pl3: uážužeh
    # uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: -
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: uážu
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: uážus
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: uážžoon
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: uážžoo
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: uážžus
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: uážžup
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: uážžuđ
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: uážžus
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: uážu
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: uážžum
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: uážuččii
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: ožžuu
    uážžuđ+V+PrsPrc: uážžoo
    uážžuđ+V+PrfPrc: uážžum
    uážžuđ+V+Actio: uážžum
    uážžuđ+V+Actio+Ess: uážžumin
    uážžuđ+V+Actio+Loc: uážžumist
    uážžuđ+V+Actio+Ill: uážžumân
    uážžuđ+V+Actio+Com: uážudijn
    #uážžuđ+V+VAbess: uážuhennáá
    #uážžuđ+V+VAbess: uážuhinnáá
    uážžuđ+V+VAbess: uážuhánnáá


  Verb - kuárruđ: # MLO checked
    kuárruđ+V+Inf: kuárruđ
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuárum
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kuáruh
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuáru
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kuárroon
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kuáruvettee
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kuárruv
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kuárrup
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kuáruvetteđ
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kuáruh
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: koorrum
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: koorruh
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kuárui
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kuároim
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kuároid
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kuároin
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kuáruim
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kuáruid
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: korruu
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Sg1: kuáruččim
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Sg2: kuáruččih
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Sg3: kuáruččij
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Du1: kuáruččáim
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Du2: kuáruččáid
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Du3: kuáruččáin
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Pl1: kuáruččijm
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Pl2: kuáruččijd
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Pl3: kuáruččii
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Sg1: kuároom
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Sg2: kuárooh
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Sg3: kuáruš
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Du1: kuáružeen
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Du2: kuárušvettee
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Du3: kuáružává
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Pl1: kuáružep
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Pl2: kuárušvetteđ
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Pl3: kuáružeh
    # kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: -
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: [kuáru, kuáro]
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: kuárus
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Du1: kuárroon
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Du2: kuárroo
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Du3: kuárrus
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: kuárrup
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kuárruđ
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: kuárrus
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: [kuáru, kuáro]
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kuárrum
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: kuáruččii
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: korruu
    kuárruđ+V+PrsPrc: kuárroo
    kuárruđ+V+PrfPrc: kuárrum
    kuárruđ+V+Actio: kuárrum
    kuárruđ+V+Actio+Ess: kuárumin
    kuárruđ+V+Actio+Loc: kuárumist
    kuárruđ+V+Actio+Ill: kuárumân
    kuárruđ+V+Actio+Com: [kuárudijn, kuárodijn]
    # kuárruđ+V+VAbess: kuáruhennáá
    # kuárruđ+V+VAbess: kuáruhinnáá
    kuárruđ+V+VAbess: kuáruhánnáá
